Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2214.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9301(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 9301. Supplemental funding for municipal highway maintenance.* * *(b) County allocation supplement.--Commencing July 1, 2014, the amount of $5,000,000 or more as determined by the department for the purposes of complying with paragraph (5), is appropriated out of the Motor License Fund to counties annually. The following shall apply:(1) The distribution shall be in the ratio of:(i) the square footage of deck area of a county's 12345678910111213141516171819 county-owned bridges; to(ii) the total square footage of deck area of county-owned bridges throughout this Commonwealth.(2) The amount of square footage under paragraph (1)(i) shall be the amount reported as part of the National Bridge Inspection Standards Program.(3) In addition to any other use authorized by law for money distributed under this subsection, a county may use the money for construction and maintenance of bridges owned by municipalities in the county.(4) For the purposes of this subsection, a city of the first class shall be considered a county.(5) A county may not receive funding under this subsection in an amount less than the amount received in the previous year unless the square footage of deck area or the total square footage of deck area of a county's county-owned bridges is less than the previous year.* * *Section 2. Section 9502(a)(2)(iv) of Title 75 is amended and the paragraph is amended by adding subparagraphs to read:§ 9502. Imposition of tax.(a) General rule.--* * *(2) An additional 55 mills is hereby imposed on all liquid fuels and fuels as defined and provided in Chapter 90 and such tax shall also be collected as provided in section 9004(b), the proceeds of which shall be distributed as follows:* * *(iv) Two percent, or more from the Motor License 20260HB2214PN3543 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Fund as determined by the department for the purpose of complying with subparagraph (ix), for bridges identified as county or forestry bridges. Distribution under this subparagraph shall be in the ratio of:(A) the square footage of deck areas, as reported as part of the National Bridge Inspection Standards Program, of a county's county-owned bridges; to(B) the total square footage of deck area, as reported as part of the National Bridge Inspection Standards Program, of all county-owned bridges in this Commonwealth.* * *(vii) In addition to any other use authorized by law for money distributed under subparagraph (iv), a county may use the money for the construction and maintenance of bridges owned by municipalities in the county.(viii) For the purposes of subparagraph (iv), a city of the first class shall be considered a county.(ix) A county may not receive funding under subparagraph (iv) in an amount less than the amount received in the previous year unless:(A) the square footage of deck area or the total square footage of deck area of a county's county-owned bridges is less than the previous year; or(B) the total amount collected under subsection (a)(2) is less than the total amount received in the previous year as determined by the department.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or 20260HB2214PN3543 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 immediately, whichever is later IN SIX MONTHS.20260HB2214PN3543 - 4 - <--1